District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1205.08

Employment rights.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title V, § 508
as added Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 2(a), 33 DCR 7241
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 301(m), 43 DCR 2978

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1548.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary repeal of §§ 31-1542 through 31-1548 [1981 Ed.], see § 301(g) through (m) of the Fiscal Year 1996 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-264, April 26, 1996, 43 DCR 2412), and § 201(g)-(m) of the Fiscal Year 1996 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-335, August 1, 1996, 43 DCR 4256).